Illinois, session 104th, HB2330.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act is 5amended by adding Section 50-15 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 430/50-15 new)7    Sec. 50-15. Affirmative defense. It is an affirmative 8defense to any criminal or civil charge under this Act that the 9person fully disclosed all relevant facts to the person's 10ethics officer and relied in good faith on the ethics 11officer's advice.